Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1022.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 12. (1) "Qualifying contribution" means a contribution of money made by a written instrument, credit card, or debit card by an individual to the candidate committee of a candidate for the office of governor that is $100.00 or less and made after April 1 of the year preceding a year in which a governor is to be elected. Not more than $100.00 of an individual's total aggregate contribution may be used as a qualifying contribution in a calendar year. Qualifying contribution does not include a subscription, loan, advance, deposit of money, in-kind contribution or expenditure, or anything else of value except as prescribed in this act. Qualifying contribution does not include a contribution by an individual who resides outside of this state. For purposes of this subsection, an individual is considered to reside in this state if he or she the individual is considered a resident of this state under the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.1 to 168.992. (2) "Senate political party caucus committee" means an independent committee established by a political party caucus of the state senate under section 24a. (3) "State elective office" means a statewide elective office or the office of state legislator. (4) "Statewide elective office" means the office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, or attorney general, justice of the supreme court, or member of the state board of education., regent of the University of Michigan, member of the board of trustees of Michigan State University, or member of the board of governors of Wayne State University. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution J of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.